Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
PART 3
RECORDS AND INFORMATION

Editor's note:
This part 3 was added with relocations in 1996, effective January 1, 1997. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

19-1-301. Short title.

This part 3 shall be known and may be cited as the "Children's Code Records and Information Act".

Source:

L. 96:
Entire part added with relocations, p. 1156, § 6, effective January 1, 1997.

19-1-302. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly declares that information obtained by public agencies in the course of performing their duties and functions under this title is considered public information under the "Colorado Open Records Act", part 2 of article 72 of title 24,
C.R.S. The general assembly, however, recognizes that certain information obtained in the course of the implementation of this title is highly sensitive and has an impact on the privacy of children and members of their
families. The disclosure of sensitive information carries the risk of stigmatizing children; however, absolute confidentiality of such information may result in duplicated services in some cases, fragmented services in
others, and the delivery of ineffective and costly programs and, in some situations, may put other members of the public at risk of harm. In addition, disclosure may result in serving the best interests of the child and
may be in the public interest.

Furthermore, the general assembly specifically finds that schools, school districts, and criminal justice agencies attempting to protect children and the public are often frustrated by their lack of ability to exchange information concerning disruptive
children who may have experienced disciplinary actions at school or whose actions outside of a school setting may have resulted in contact with local law enforcement. The general assembly finds that schools, school districts,
and criminal justice agencies are often better able to assist such disruptive children and to preserve school safety when they are equipped with knowledge concerning a child's history and experiences. The general assembly,
however, recognizes that any such sharing of information among and between schools, school districts, and agencies to promote school safety or otherwise to assist disruptive children mandates an awareness of the responsibility
on the part of those schools, school districts, and agencies receiving or providing the information that it be used only for its intended and limited purpose as authorized by law and that the confidential nature of the
information be preserved. The general assembly finds, therefore, that it is desirable to authorize and encourage open communication among appropriate agencies, including criminal justice agencies, assessment centers for
children, school districts, and schools, in order to assist disruptive children and to maintain safe schools.

The general assembly further finds that partners in multi-agency assessment centers for children are often frustrated by their lack of ability to exchange information with each other when attempting to serve children and the public. The general assembly
finds that assessment centers for children are better able to assist children when they are equipped with knowledge concerning a child's history and experiences. The general assembly, however, recognizes that any such sharing
of information among agencies who are part of a multi-agency assessment center for children mandates an awareness of the responsibility on the part of the agencies receiving or providing the information that it be used
only for its intended and limited purpose as authorized by law and that the confidential nature of the information be preserved.

The general assembly recognizes the importance of children receiving support from all responsible parties and further finds that the state child support enforcement agency and the delegate child support enforcement units have a need to exchange information
with other state, federal, and local agencies in order to effectively locate responsible parties; establish paternity and child support, including child support debt pursuant to section 14-14-104, C.R.S.; enforce support
orders; disburse collected child support payments; and facilitate the efficient and effective delivery of services under articles 13 and 13.5 of title 26, C.R.S. Therefore, the general assembly recognizes that the state
child support enforcement agency and the delegate child support enforcement units need access to the records and databases of the judicial department, the contents of which are otherwise protected under the provisions of
this part 3. The general assembly, however, recognizes that any such information sharing mandates an awareness of responsibility on the part of the state child support enforcement agency and the delegate child support enforcement
units receiving information that it be used only for its intended purposes as authorized by law and in accordance with the provisions of section 26-13-102.7, C.R.S., and that the confidential nature of the information be
preserved.

The general assembly recognizes the need to make recommendations to the court concerning the many aspects of a child's legal status, including but not limited to existing court orders on placement of the child, legal custody of the child, and orders of
protection. Because the population of this state is transitory, and jurisdictional lines for the purpose of court actions are arbitrary, communication of certain information available electronically on a statewide basis
may assist state and county agencies, attorneys representing state or county agencies, and attorneys appointed by the court in making recommendations to the court. The general assembly recognizes that any such sharing of
information among agencies, attorneys representing agencies, and attorneys appointed by the court mandates an awareness of the responsibility on the part of these agencies, attorneys representing agencies, and attorneys
appointed by the court in receiving and providing the information that it be used only for its intended and limited purpose as authorized by law and that the confidential nature of the information be preserved.

The general assembly further recognizes the need for the command authority of military installations under the United States secretary of defense to receive notice and information regarding any report that is assigned for an assessment by the state department
of human services or a county department of known or suspected instances of child abuse or neglect in which the person having care of the child in question is a member of the armed forces or a spouse, or a significant
other or family member residing in the home of the member of the armed forces. The general assembly recognizes the need for the state department of human services and county departments to collect information concerning
the military affiliation of the individual having custody or control of a child who is the subject of an investigation of child abuse or neglect.

To further the fulfillment of these needs, the state department of human services and county departments should be able to enter into memorandums of understanding with the command authority of military installations. The memorandums of understanding may
establish protocols for the sharing of information related to assessments of known or suspected instances of child abuse or neglect and for collaboration on the oversight of child abuse or neglect investigations
involving a member of the armed forces or a spouse, or a significant other or family member residing in the home of the member of the armed forces.

The general assembly, however, recognizes that any sharing of such information is critical for an awareness of the responsibility of the involved agencies and military installations that receive or provide the information that it be used only for its
intended and limited purpose as authorized by law and that the confidential nature of the information must be preserved.

The general assembly finds, therefore, that it is desirable to authorize and encourage open communication between the state department of human services, county departments, and command authority of military installations to better serve children and
families of Colorado.

Therefore, in an effort to balance the best interests of children and the privacy interests of children and their families with the need to share information among service agencies and schools and the need to protect the safety of schools and the public
at large, the general assembly enacts the provisions of this part 3.

Source:

L. 96:
Entire part added with relocations, p. 1156, § 6, effective January 1, 1997.

L. 2000:
Entire section amended, p. 314, § 1, effective April 7.

L. 2003:
(1)(d) added, p. 1266, § 55, effective July 1.

L. 2008:
(1)(e) added, p. 1241, § 3, effective August 5.

L. 2009:
(1)(a) amended, (SB 09-292), ch. 369, p. 1949, § 35, effective August 5.

L. 2017:
(1)(f) added, (SB 17-028), ch. 332, p. 1782, § 1, effective August 9.

19-1-303. General provisions - delinquency and dependency and neglect cases - exchange of information - civil penalty - rules - definitions.

The judicial department or any agency that performs duties and functions under this title with respect to juvenile delinquency or dependency and neglect cases or any other provisions of this title may exchange information, to the extent necessary, for
the acquisition, provision, oversight, or referral of services and support with the judicial department or any other agency or individual, including an attorney representing state or county agencies and an attorney appointed
by the court, that performs duties and functions under this title with respect to such cases. In order to receive such information, the judicial department, attorney, or agency shall have a need to know for purposes of
investigations and case management in the provision of services or the administration of their respective programs. The judicial department or the agencies shall exchange information in accordance with paragraph (b) of
this subsection (1).

The judicial department, an agency, an attorney representing an agency, or an attorney appointed by the court described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) shall exchange information with the judicial department or similar agencies or individuals
who have a need to know to the extent necessary for the acquisition, provision, oversight, and referral of services and support and if provided in the course of an investigation or for case management purposes. The provision
of information by the judicial department shall include electronic read-only access to the name index and register of actions for agencies or attorneys appointed by the court to those case types necessary to carry out their
statutory purpose and the duties of their court appointment as provided in this part 3. The state court administrator of the judicial department and the executive directors of the affected agencies shall ensure that there
is a process for electronically exchanging information pursuant to this section. Agencies, attorneys, and individuals shall maintain the confidentiality of the information obtained.

Nothing in this section shall require the exchange of information that is subject to the attorney-client privilege under section 13-90-107 (1)(b), C.R.S.

School personnel may obtain from the judicial department or agencies described in paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section any information required to perform their legal duties and responsibilities. Said personnel shall maintain the confidentiality
of the information obtained.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any criminal justice agency or assessment center for children in the state may share any information or records concerning a specific child who is or will be enrolled as a student at a school
with that school's principal or with the principal's designee and, if the student is or will be enrolled at a public school, with the superintendent of the school district in which the student is or will be enrolled or
the superintendent's designee as follows:

Any information or records, except mental health or medical records, relating to incidents that, in the discretion of the agency or center, rise to the level of a public safety concern including, but not limited to, any information or records of threats
made by the child, any arrest or charging information, any information regarding municipal ordinance violations, and any arrest or charging information relating to acts that, if committed by an adult, would constitute
misdemeanors or felonies; or

Any records, except mental health or medical records, of incidents that such agency or center may have concerning the child that, in the discretion of the agency or center, do not rise to the level of a public safety concern but that relate to the adjudication
or conviction of a child for a municipal ordinance violation or that relate to the charging, adjudication, deferred prosecution, deferred judgment, or diversion of a child for an act that, if committed by an adult,
would have constituted a misdemeanor or a felony.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a criminal justice agency investigating a criminal matter or a matter under the "School Attendance Law of 1963", part 1 of article 33 of title 22, C.R.S., concerning a child may seek disciplinary
and truancy information from the principal of a school, or the principal's designee, at which the child is or will be enrolled as a student and, if the student is enrolled in a public school, from the superintendent of
the school district in which the student is enrolled, or such superintendent's designee. Upon written certification by the criminal justice agency that the information will not be disclosed to any other party, except as
specifically authorized or required by law, without the prior written consent of the child's parent, either the principal of the school in which the child is enrolled, or such principal's designee, or, if the student is
enrolled in a public school, the superintendent of the school district in which the student is enrolled, or such superintendent's designee, shall provide the child's attendance and disciplinary records to the requesting
criminal justice agency. The criminal justice agency receiving such information shall use it only for the performance of its legal duties and responsibilities and shall maintain the confidentiality of the information received.

School and school district personnel receiving information pursuant to this subsection (2) shall use it only in the performance of their legal duties and responsibilities and shall otherwise maintain the confidentiality of the information received. Any
information received by a school or a school district pursuant to this subsection (2) that is shared with another school or a school district to which a student may be transferring shall only be shared in compliance with
the requirements of federal law.

(2.5) (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary and in addition to the provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section, assessment centers for children and the agencies, other than schools and school districts, participating
in the local assessment centers for children are authorized to provide and share information, except for mental health or medical records and information, with each other, without the necessity of signed releases, concerning
children who have been taken into temporary custody by law enforcement or who have been referred to the assessment center for children for case management purposes. Agencies shall have annually updated signed agreements
with assessment centers for children to be considered a participating agency.

For purposes of sharing information pursuant to this subsection (2.5) only, "mental health or medical records and information" does not include the standardized behavioral or mental health disorder screening. An assessment center that conducts a standardized
behavioral or mental health disorder screening on a child who has been taken into temporary custody by law enforcement or has been referred to the assessment center for children for case management purposes may share the
results of such screening, without the necessity of a signed release, with the agencies, other than schools and school districts, participating in the assessment center for children. To receive the results of the standardized
behavioral or mental health disorder screening, a participating agency must have a need to know for purposes of investigations and case management in the administration of its respective programs. Any participating agency
receiving such information shall use it only for the performance of its legal duties and responsibilities and shall maintain the confidentiality of the information received, except as may be required pursuant to rule 16
of the Colorado rules of criminal procedure.

(2.6) (a) The state department of human services and county departments:

Shall collect information concerning the military affiliation of any person who has custody or control of a child who is the subject of an investigation of child abuse or neglect;

Shall provide notice and information to the command authority of military installations under the United States secretary of defense regarding any report received of known or suspected instances of child abuse or neglect that is assigned for an assessment
and in which the person having custody or control of the child is a member of the armed forces or a spouse, or a significant other or family member residing in the home of the member of the armed forces assigned
to that military installation; and

May enter into memorandums of understanding with the command authority of military installations establishing protocols for the sharing of information and for collaboration on the oversight of investigations involving a member of the armed forces or a
spouse, or a significant other or family member residing in the home of the member of the armed forces. The military installation receiving information shall ensure it is used only for its intended and limited purpose
as authorized by law and that the confidential nature of the information is preserved.

The state board of human services may promulgate any rules necessary for the implementation of this subsection (2.6).

(2.7) (a) Upon the receipt of written notice sent by a foster parent, employees of the department of human services and of county departments, or other individuals with a need to know, shall be prohibited from releasing personally identifiable information
about a foster parent, other than the foster parent's first name, to any adult member of the foster child's family, unless the foster parent subsequently provides his or her express written consent for the release of the
information. The consent may consist of a hand-written note by the foster parent specifying the foster child's name, the consent for release of information to the foster child's family, the foster parent's signature, and
the date. The consent shall be given individually for each foster child, unless the foster children are members of a sibling group.

The civil penalty described in subsection (4.7) of this section shall not apply to any foster child or siblings of the foster child.

and (4) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2000, p. 315, § 2, effective April 7, 2000.) (4.3) School and school district personnel, employees of the state judicial department, employees of state agencies, employees of criminal justice agencies, and employees of
assessment centers for children who share information concerning a child pursuant to this part 3 shall be immune from civil and criminal liability if such personnel or employee acted in good faith compliance with the provisions
of this part 3. (4.4) The judicial department, with respect to dependency or neglect cases or any other provisions under this title, shall exchange information, to the extent necessary, with the state child support enforcement
agency and the delegate child support enforcement units for the purposes of effectively locating responsible parties, establishing paternity and child support, including child support debt pursuant to section

14-14-104

, C.R.S., enforcing support orders, disbursing collected child support payments, and facilitating the efficient and effective delivery of services under articles 13 and 13.5 of title 26, C.R.S. (4.7) Any person who
knowingly violates the confidentiality provisions of this section shall be subject to a civil penalty of up to one thousand dollars. (5) The provisions of this section are in addition to and not in lieu of other statutory provisions
of law pertaining to the release of information. Access to or exchange of information not otherwise addressed by this section is governed as otherwise provided by law. (6) For purposes of this section:

"Assessment center for children" is defined in section

19-1-103

(13).

"Case management purposes" is defined in section

19-1-103

(19).

"Criminal justice agency" is defined in section 19-1-103 (48).

"Need to know" is defined in section 19-1-103 (99).

"School" is defined in section 19-1-103 (123). (7) This section shall be interpreted to promote the best interests of the child and, where possible, the child's family. (8)(Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 1242, § 4, effective August 5, 2008.) (9)(Deleted
by amendment, L. 2008, p. 1242, § 4, effective August 5, 2008.) (10) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 1242, § 4, effective August 5, 2008.) (11) (a) The judicial department or any agency described in subsection (1)(a)
of this section may provide a prospective foster parent, as defined by rule of the department of human services, or a foster parent who is responsible for the health or welfare of a foster child named in a report who is
residing in the foster parent's home, with information that is necessary to meet the foster child's physical, mental, emotional, behavioral, and other identified trauma needs. (b) The information described in subsection
(11)(a) of this section is only information directly relevant to meeting the foster child's physical, mental, emotional, behavioral, and other identified trauma needs, and includes, but is not limited to, the following:

A foster child's educational records;

Relevant information in the family services plan to meet the safety, permanency, and well-being needs of the foster child, including any safety issues that impact the foster parent's ability to parent the foster child;

Circumstances related to the removal of the foster child from his or her home; and

Youth placement history, including safety concerns and reasons for unplanned placement moves. (c) Mental health and medical records of a child may be released pursuant to this subsection (11), subject to any privilege recognized or governed by state or
federal law.

The foster parent shall maintain the confidentiality of any information obtained pursuant to this subsection (11).

Source:

L. 96:
Entire part added with relocations, p. 1156, § 6, effective January 1, 1997.

L. 2000:
Entire section amended, p. 315, § 2, effective April 7.

L. 2001:
(2)(c) amended, p. 870, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 2002:
(2.5) amended, p. 575, § 5, effective May 24.

L. 2003:
(4.4) added, p. 1267, § 56, effective July 1.

L. 2004:
(2.7) added, p. 973, § 2, effective August 4.

L. 2007:
(8), (9), and (10) added, p. 1300, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2008:
(1), (8), (9), and (10) amended, p. 1242, § 4, effective August 5.

L. 2016:
(5) amended, (HB 16-1098), ch. 103, p. 297, § 1, effective April 15.

L. 2017:
(2.5)(b) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1309, § 151, effective May 25; (2.6) added, (SB 17-028), ch. 332, p. 1783, § 2, effective August 9.

L. 2018:
(11) added, (HB 18-1348), ch. 325, p. 1960, § 1, effective May 30.

L. 2022:
(6)(a), (6)(a.1), (6)(a.3), (6)(b), and (6)(c) amended, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2971, § 35, effective August 10.

Editor's note:
Subsection (6)(c) was originally enacted as subsection (6)(a.7) in House Bill 00-1119 but was renumbered on revision in 2003 for ease of location.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.